Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Chapter 14.1 Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act
15-14.1-32.
Hearing and order.

Unless the court issues a temporary emergency order, upon a finding that a petitioner is entitled to immediate physical custody of the child, the court shall order that the petitioner may take immediate physical custody of the child unless the respondent establishes that:

The child custody determination has not been registered and confirmed and that:

The issuing court did not have jurisdiction;

The child custody determination for which enforcement is sought has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court of a state having jurisdiction to do so; or

The respondent was entitled to notice, but notice was not given in the proceedings before the court that issued the order for which enforcement is sought; or

The child custody determination for which enforcement is sought was registered and confirmed but has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court of a state having jurisdiction to do so.

The court may award the fees, costs, and expenses and may grant additional relief, including a request for the assistance of law enforcement officials, and set a further hearing to determine whether additional relief is appropriate.

If a party called to testify refuses to answer on the grounds that the testimony may be self-incriminating, the court may draw an adverse inference from the refusal.

A privilege against disclosure of communications between spouses and a defense of immunity based on the relationship of husband and wife or parent and child may not be invoked in a proceeding under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 307, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 322, § 2.

15-14.1-33.
Warrant to take physical custody of child.

Upon the filing of a petition seeking enforcement of a child custody determination, the petitioner may file a verified application for the issuance of a warrant to take physical custody of the child if the child is immediately likely to suffer serious physical harm or be removed from this state.

If the court, upon the testimony of the petitioner or other witness, finds that the child is imminently likely to suffer serious physical harm or be removed from this state, it may issue a warrant to take physical custody of the child. The petition must be heard on the next judicial day after the warrant is executed unless that date is impossible. In that event, the court shall hold the hearing on the first judicial day possible. The application for the warrant must include the statements required by this chapter.

A warrant to take physical custody of a child must:

Recite the facts upon which a conclusion of imminent serious physical harm or removal from the jurisdiction is based;

Direct law enforcement officers to take physical custody of the child immediately; and

Provide for the placement of the child pending final relief.

The respondent must be served with the petition, warrant, and order immediately after the child is taken into physical custody.

A warrant to take physical custody of a child is enforceable throughout this state. If the court finds on the basis of the testimony of the petitioner or other witness that a less intrusive remedy is not effective, it may authorize law enforcement officers to enter private property to take physical custody of the child. If required by exigent circumstances of the case, the court may authorize law enforcement officers to make a forcible entry at any hour.

The court may impose conditions upon placement of a child to ensure the appearance of the child and the child’s custodian.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 307, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 322, § 2.

15-14.1-34.
Costs, fees, and expenses.

The court may award the prevailing party, including a state, necessary and reasonable expenses incurred by or on behalf of the party, including costs, communication expenses, attorneys’ fees, investigative fees, expenses for witnesses, travel expenses, and child care during the course of the proceedings.

The court may not assess fees, costs, or expenses against a state unless authorized by law other than this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 307, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 322, § 2.

15-14.1-35.
Recognition and enforcement.

A court of this state shall accord full faith and credit to an order issued by another state and consistent with this chapter which enforces a child custody determination by a court of another state unless the order has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court having jurisdiction to do so under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 307, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 322, § 2.

15-14.1-36.
Appeals.

An appeal may be taken from a final order in a proceeding under this chapter in accordance with expedited appellate procedures in other civil cases. Unless the court enters a temporary emergency order, the enforcing court may not stay an order enforcing a child custody determination pending appeal.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 307, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 322, § 2.

15-14.1-37.
Role of prosecutor or public official.

In a case arising under this chapter or involving the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction, the prosecutor or other appropriate public official may take any lawful action, including resorting to a proceeding under this chapter or any other available civil proceeding to locate a child, obtain the return of a child, or enforce a child custody determination if there is:

An existing child custody determination;

A request to do so from a court in a pending child custody proceeding;

A reasonable belief that a criminal statute has been violated; or

A reasonable belief that the child has been wrongfully removed or retained in violation of the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction.

A prosecutor or appropriate public official acting under this section acts on behalf of the court and may not represent any party.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 307, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 322, § 2.

15-14.1-38.
Role of law enforcement.

At the request of a prosecutor or other appropriate public official, a law enforcement officer may take any lawful action reasonably necessary to locate a child or a party and assist a prosecutor or appropriate public official.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 307, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 322, § 2.

15-14.1-39.
Costs and expenses.

If the respondent is not the prevailing party, the court may assess against the respondent all direct expenses and costs incurred by the prosecutor or other appropriate public official and law enforcement officers.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 307, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 322, § 2.

15-14.1-40.
Application and construction.

In applying and construing this chapter, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 307, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 322, § 2.

15-14.1-41.
Severability clause.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 307, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 322, § 2.

15-14.1-42.
Transitional provision.

A motion or other request for relief made in a child custody proceeding or to enforce a child custody determination which was commenced before the effective date of this chapter [July 17, 2003] is governed by the law in effect at the time the motion or other request was made.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 307, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 322, § 2.